New Jersey, session 221, A5245.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  a.  Notwithstanding any other law, or any rule or regulation adopted pursuant thereto to the contrary, it shall be unlawful to set a snare or cable restraint trap on any National Guard property that is 150 acres or more in size, and is located in a municipality with a population density of at least 1,500 persons per square mile according to the 2020 decennial census. b.  A person who violates subsection a. of this section shall be liable to a civil penalty of not less than $100 nor more than $200 for the first offense, and not less than $200 nor more than $500 for each subsequent offense.  Each snare or cable restraint set shall constitute a separate offense.  The Commissioner of Environmental Protection may enforce the provisions of this section.  Any penalty imposed pursuant to this section may be collected, with costs, in a summary proceeding pursuant to the "Penalty Enforcement Law of 1999," P.L.1999, c.274 (C.2A:58-10 et seq.).  The Superior Court and the municipal court shall have jurisdiction to enforce the provisions of the "Penalty Enforcement Law of 1999" in connection with this act. 2. This act shall take effect immediately.